Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1399.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2904.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-2904.01. Prepaid capitated contracts; expenditures; annual report On or before December 1 of each year, the administration shall annually report to the joint legislative budget committee, the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the House of representatives and the members of the senate and house of representatives health and human services committees, or their successor committees, in aggregate for all nongovernment entities that have a prepaid capitated contract with the administration, The percentage of monies in the previous contract year: 1. that was spent on direct payments to providers for services. 2. that was spent on administrative costs for each of the following: (a) Health care quality improvement administrative activities. (b) Program integrity, including fraud, waste and abuse prevention expenses. (c) Taxes, licenses and regulatory fees. (d) Community reinvestment. (e) All other administrative activities.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.